Tennessee, session 114, SB2356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of health shall utilize existing resources to conduct a
study of recent legislative developments regarding assisted reproductive technology in
neighboring states. The purpose of the study is to provide the general assembly with
information on recent legislation in neighboring states concerning patient access and patient
safety as it pertains to the use of assisted reproductive technology. The scope of the study is
legislative changes enacted in such states within the last five (5) calendar years. No later than
December 31, 2026, the commissioner shall transmit a copy of the commissioner's findings from
the study and any legislative recommendations to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of
the house of representatives, and the legislative librarian. The commissioner may use
electronic means to publish and transmit the study findings and recommendations.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2356
011957
- 1 -